en: California seedless Thompson raisin, California seedless Thompson raisins
sv: kaliforniska Thompson-russin utan kärnor

en: Corinthian raisins, zante currants
da: Korend
de: korinthische Rosinen, Korinthiaki, Korinthe, Korinthen
es: Pasa de Corinto
et: Korint
fa: مویز
fi: korintti
fr: raisin de Corinthe, raisins de corinthe
hr: korintske grožđice
io: Korinto
it: uva secca di Cornito
ja: ザキントス・カラント
ko: 블랙 코린트
nl: krent, krenten
nn: Korintar
oc: Pansarilha
ru: Коринка
sd: ڪاري ڊاک
sv: Korinter

en: grape juice, raisin juice
ar: عصير العنب
az: üzüm şirəsi
be: вінаградны сок
bg: сок от грозде
ca: suc de raïm
cs: hroznová šťáva
de: Traubensaft
el: χυμός σταφυλιού
eo: vinbera suko
es: zumo de uva, jugo de uva, zumo de pasas, jugo de pasas, zumo de pasas de uva, jugo de pasas de uva
et: viinamarjamahl
fa: آب انگور
fi: rypälemehu, viinirypälemehu
fr: jus de raisin
ga: sú fíonchaor
gl: zume de uva
he: מיץ ענבים
hr: groždanog soka
hy: խաղողի հյութ
id: jus anggur
it: succo d'uva
ja: ぶどうジュース, ぶどう果汁
jv: jus anggur
ko: 포도 주스
kw: sugen grappys
la: mustum conditum
mk: гроздов сок
ms: jus anggur
nb: druesaft, druejus, druejuice
nl: druivensap, druivesap
nn: druesaft, druejus, druejuice
pl: sok z winogron, sok winogronowy
pt: sumo de uva, suco de uva
ru: виноградный сок
sa: द्राक्षाफलरसः
sl: grozdni sok
sq: lëngu i rrushit
sr: сок од грожђа
sv: druvsaft, druvjuice
th: น้ำองุ่น
tr: üzüm suyu
tt: виноград суы
uk: виноградний сік
yi: טרויבן-זאפט
zh: 葡萄汁

en: concentrated grape juice, grape juice concentrate
bg: концентриран гроздов сок
de: Traubensaftkonzentrat
es: zumo de uva concentrado, jugo de uva concentrado
fi: rypälemehutiiviste, viinirypälemehutiiviste
fr: jus de raisin concentré, concentré de jus de raisin, jus concentré de raisin
hr: koncentrat grožđanog soka
it: ssucco concentrato d'uva
nl: Geconcentreerd grapefruitsap
pl: zagęszczony sok winogronowy, koncentrat soku winogronowego
sv: druvsaftkoncentrat, druvjuicekoncentrat
th: จากนำองุ่นเข้มข้น

en: grape juice from concentrate
bg: гроздов сок от концентрат, концентрат на гроздов сок
de: Traubensaft aus Traubensaftkonzentrat
es: jugo de uva concentrado reconstituido
fr: jus de raisin à base de concentré, jus de raisins à base de concentré
hr: sok od grožđa iz koncentrata
it: succo d'uva da concentrato
pl: sok winogronowy z koncentratu soku winogronowego

en: white grape juice from concentrate
de: Weißer Traubensaft aus Konzentrat
it: succo d'uva bianca da concentrato

en: white grape juice
de: Traubensaft weiss
es: zumo de uva blanca, jugo de uva blanca
fi: vaalea rypälemehu
fr: jus de raisin blanc
hr: sok od bijelog grožđa
it: succo d'uva bianca
nl: Witte druivensap
pl: sok z białych winogron

en: concentrated white grape juice, white grape juice concentrate
es: zumo de uva blanca concentrado, jugo de uva blanca concentrado
fi: vaalea rypälemehutiiviste
fr: jus de raisin blanc concentré
hr: koncentriranog soka od bijelog grožđa
it: succo d'uva bianca concentrato

en: organic concentrated white grape juice, organic white grape juice concentrate
fi: luomu vaalea rypälemehutiiviste
fr: jus concentre de raisin blanc bio
hr: organski koncentrirani sok od bijelog grožđa
it: succo d'uva bianca concentrato biologico

en: Chasselas grape juice
de: Chasselas-Traubensaft
es: jugo de uva chasselas
fr: jus de raisin chasselas
hr: chasselas sok od grožđa
it: succo d'uva chasselas
nl: Chasselas druivensap

en: Muscat grape juice
fr: jus de raisin muscat, jus de raisin blanc muscat, jus de raisin muscaté
it: succo d'uva moscato

en: red grape juice, red grape fruit juice
bg: сок от червено грозде
de: Rotweintraubensaft, roter Traubensaft
es: zumo de uva roja, jugo de uva roja, zumo de uva tinto, jugo de uva tinto
fi: punainen rypälemehu
fr: jus de raisin rouge
hr: sok od crvenog grožđa, voćni sok crvenog grožđa
it: succo d'uva rossa, succo di uva rossa
nl: rode druivensap, blauw druivensap
pl: sok z czerwonych winogron
pt: suco de uva tinta, sumo de uva tinta, suco de uva vermelha, sumo de uva vermelha
th: น้ำองุ่นแดง

en: red grape from concentrate
de: rote Trauben aus Traubenkonzentrat
fi: punainen rypälemehu tiivisteestä
fr: Raisin rouge à base de concentré, Jus de raisin à base de jus de raisin rouge concentré
hr: crveno grožđe iz koncentrata
it: uva rossa da concentrato
pt: suco de uva tinta à base de concentrado, sumo de uva tinta à base de concentrado

en: Concord grape juice
it: succo d'uva Concord

en: pure grape juice
de: Traubendirektsaft, direkt gepresst Traubensaft
it: succo d'uva puro

en: white and red grape juice
fr: Jus de raisin blanc et rouge
it: succo d'uva bianca e rossa

en: must
az: Must
ca: Most
cs: mošt
de: Most
el: Μούστος
eo: Mosto
es: Mosto
eu: Muztio
fa: پوراب
fr: moût
gl: Mosto
hr: mošt
hu: must
io: Mosto
it: mosto
ja: ムスト
ko: 머스트
la: Mustum
mk: шира
nb: most
nl: most
oc: Most
pl: Moszcz
pt: mosto
ro: Must
sk: Mušt
sl: Mošt
sw: Must
uk: Муст
zh: 葡萄漿

en: concentrated apple must
fr: moût de pomme concentré
it: mosto di mela concentrato

en: grape must
ca: most de raïm
cs: Vinný mošt
de: Traubenmost
es: Mosto de uva
fi: puristemehu, rypäleen puristemehu
fr: moût de raisin
hr: mošt grožđa, grožđanog mošta, groždani mošt
it: mosto d'uva
nl: druivenmost
pl: moszcz winogronowy, moszcz z winogron
ro: must de struguri
ru: виноградное сусло
sq: mushti i rrushit
ta: நொதியேறாப் பழச்சாறு

en: concentrated grape must
de: Traubenmostkonzentrat, konzentrierter Traubenmost
es: Mosto de uvas desde concentrado, mosto concentrado de uva
fi: rypäleen puristemehuntiiviste
fr: moût de raisin concentré
hr: koncentrirani grožiani mošt, koncentrirani grožđani mošt
it: mosto d'uva concentrato
nl: geconcentreerde druivenmost
pl: skoncentrowany moszcz winogronowy, skoncentrowany moszcz z winogron